srcV2/esu.twol
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Alaskuk Strunk"

! This Central Alaskan Yup'ik FST morphological analyzer/generator and the 
! associated source code is available under the GNU Affero General Public 
! License (GNU AGPL v.3):
!
! Copyright (C) 2020 Lonny Alaskuk Strunk
!
! This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it under 
! the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by the Free 
! Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or (at your option) any 
! later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but WITHOUT 
! ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS 
! FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU Affero General Public License for more 
! details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License along 
! with this program. If not, see https://www.gnu.org/licenses/.


Alphabet
    a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
    vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr '
    k̲:k q̲:q g̲:g r̲:r g̲g̲:gg r̲r̲:rr                 ! for -velar postbase assimilation
    %[e%] %[e%]:e                               ! HBC/Nun: initial e is not weak
    ạ ụ ġ                                       ! for (ar) droppping ; for vowel dropping in connective moods ending in a vowel ; ya(g)ar*

    A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Vv Ll Ss Gg Rr Ng N͞g U͡g U͡gg U͡r U͡rr M̄ N̄ ! pass through for [NonYupik]
    1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30 31 32 33 34 35 36 37 38 39 ! pass through for [NonYupik]

    %< %$ %& %↞ %↠ ! real morpheme segmenter

    ! All operators and allomorph operators map to morpheme segmenter 
    %(e%):%> %(g%):%> %(r%):%> %(s%):%> %(t%):%> %(u%):%>
    %(ar%):%> %(ar%*%):%> %(ng%):%> ! %(ur%):%> %(aa%):%> %(a%):%>
    %(g%|t%):%> %(r%|l%):%> %(u%|i%):%>

    %+:%> %–:%> %~:%> %%:%> %::%> %`:%> %.:%> %*:%> %°:%>
    %@¹:%> %@²:%> %@³:%> %@⁴:%> %@⁵:%> %@ˡ:%> %@ˁ:%> %@ʸ:%> %@:%>  
    %=; 

Sets 
    Sep = %< %& %↞ %↠ %$ ;
    Bndry = %+ %– %~ %% %: %` %. %* %° %< %$
        %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@
        %(a%) %(e%) %(g%) %(r%) %(s%) %(t%) %(u%)
        %(aa%) %(ar%) %(ar%*%) %(ng%) %(ur%) %(g%|t%) %(r%|l%) %(u%|i%) ;
    AtSign = %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@ ;

    Stop = p t c k q k̲ q̲ ;
    VoiceFric = v l s g r u͡g u͡r g̲ r̲ ġ ; 
    VlessFric = vv ll ss gg rr u͡gg u͡rr g̲g̲ r̲r̲ ;
    VoiceNasal = m n ng ;
    VlessNasal = m̄ n̄ n͞g ;

    VoiceCon = VoiceFric VoiceNasal ;
    VlessCon = VlessFric VlessNasal Stop ;

    Fric = VoiceFric VlessFric ;
    Nasal = VoiceNasal VlessNasal ;

    Con = Stop Fric Nasal w y ;

    FVow = a i u ạ ụ ;
    Vow = FVow e ;

Rules 

"a:0 = --"
a:0 <=> _ [[ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        [[ .#. :Con ] / Sep ] _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"a:i = age/ii | aga/ii | anga/ii | aga/ii | enga/ii"
a:i <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ g: %%: %:: %(e%):i Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii 
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:(~)(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii

        [[ [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) ] / Sep ] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [[ [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:|e:] %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] ] / Sep ] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii ; e:(ng)a -> ii

    except
        _ [[ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ]  ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also

"ạ:0 = --"
ạ:0 <=> _ [[ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ]  ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        [[ .#. :Con ] / Sep ] _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"ạ:i = age/ii | aga/ii | anga/ii | aga/ii | enga/ii"
ạ:i <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ g: %%: %:: %(e%):i Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii 
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii

        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:|e:] %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii ; e:(ng)a -> ii
    except
        _ [[ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also

"e:0 = ~ | word# | eVowPostbase | semifinaleVowPostbase | (e):e | -- | te@ "
e:0 <=> _ [[ [ Bndry: - %`: - %(r%): ]* %~: ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Tilde"
        [[ :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* t:n ] / Sep ] _ [[ [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! "Word final Vte -> e:0"
        _ [[ Bndry:+ :Vow ] / Sep ] ; ! "vowel postbases are e deleters" "(u):u"
        [[ .#. ~[ :* :Con :VlessCon] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [ r | g ] [ Bndry: - %(t%): - %(g%|t%): ]+ :Vow ] / Sep ] ; ! "vowel postbases are semi-final e deleters" "(u):u"   !maybe ~[:Con :VlessCon] for amlleret ? 
        [[ [[Vow Con]|[Con VoiceCon]] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [ r | g ] Bndry:* %%:%> Bndry:* %(e%):e ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule (e):e"
        _ [[ (Con:0) Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
        [[ t: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Bndry:-AtSign:]* AtSign: ] / Sep ] ; ! te@
    except
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [i:|u:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! e:(ng)i -> ai ; e:(ng)u -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! e:(ng)a -> ii
        [[ .#. :Con ] / Sep ] _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"e:a = e^a | engi/ai"
e:a <=> _ [[ [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! "Word final e:a"
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [i:|u:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! e:(ng)i -> ai ; e:(ng)u -> au
    except
        [[ :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* t:n ] / Sep ] _ [[ [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! "Word final Vte -> e:0"

"e:i = enga/ii"
e:i <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! e:(ng)a -> ii

"g:0 = - | :"
g:0 <=> _ [[ Bndry:* %–: ] / Sep ] ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
        [[ Con FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ [%@³:|%~:] %:: %(u%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ag@³:(u) -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %%: %:: %(e%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[  %:: %(u%|i%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:(u/i) -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! a:gu -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ag:a -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! Vg:(~)(ng)V -> VV

"g:gg = g+VlessCon"
g:gg <=> _ [[ %+: VlessCon: ] / Sep ] ; ! g+te

"g̲:r = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
g̲:r <=> [[ [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"g:k = word#"
g:k <=> _ [[ [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! Word Final changes

"gg:g = gte@(u)"
gg:g <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"g̲g̲:rr = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
g̲g̲:rr <=> [[ [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"i:0 = --"
i:0 <=> _ [[ Con:0 Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        [[ .#. :Con ] / Sep ] _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"k̲:q = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
k̲:q <=> [[ [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"l:0 = --" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
l:0 => Vow:0 (Con:0) Bndry:* %–: %–: _ ; ! Rule for Double Minus - 

"l:ll = te@ˡl/ll"
l:ll <=> [[ t:0 (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* %@ˡ: [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te@ˡl/ll  -(r) for qimugterluni

"ll:l = lte@(u)"
ll:l <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"m:m̄ = @²m"
m:m̄ <=> [[ Con [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Cte@²m/Cm̄

"n:n̄ = @¹n"
n:n̄ <=> [[ Con [Bndry:-AtSign:]* t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@¹: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Cte@¹n/Cn̄

"ng:0 = :"
ng:0 <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! u:nga -> ua ; a:nga -> ii
    except
        [[ Con [Bndry:-AtSign:]* t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Cte@²ng/Cn͞g

"ng:n͞g = @²ng"
ng:n͞g <=> [[ Con [Bndry:-AtSign:]* t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Cte@²ng/Cn͞g

"q̲:k = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
q̲:k <=> [[ g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"r:0 = - | % | :"
r:0 <=> _ [[ Bndry:* %–: ] / Sep ] ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
        [[ [FVow|%=:] ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Bndry: - %*:]* %%:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! Rule for Percent
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %*: %%: %:: %(e%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ar*%:(e) -> aa
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %~:  %:: %(u%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ar@³:(u) -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %@³: %:: %(u%): Con: ] / Sep ] ; ! ar@³:(u) -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: %(u%|i%): [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! ar:(u/i) -> au
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! i:ru -> iu
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ %:: FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ar:a -> aa
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow ] / Sep ] _ [[ (%*:) %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! ar(*):(~)(ng)a -> ii
        [[ %=: ] / Sep ] _ [[ (%*:) %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! =r:(~)(ng)a -> =a

"r:rr = r+VlessCon"
r:rr <=> _ [[ %+: VlessCon: ] / Sep ] ; ! g+te

"r̲:g = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
r̲:g <=> [[ g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"r:q = word#"
r:q <=> _ [[ (%*:) [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! Word Final changes

"rr:0 = -"
rr:0 <=> _ [[ Bndry:* %–: ] / Sep ] ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
    except
        _ [[ Bndry:* %–: [k:|k̲:|q:|q̲:] Vow: ] / Sep ] ; ! rr-qa -> rqa

"r̲r̲:gg = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
r̲r̲:gg <=> [[ g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"rr:r = rte@(u)"
rr:r <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"s:0 = te~s/c | (t)s/c"
s:0 <=> [[ t:c (') e:0 Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te~s/c
        [[ %(t%):c Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! (t)s/c

"ss:s = ste@(u)"
ss:s <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"t:0 = Cte@¹n/CCn̄ | Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv | Cte@³(u)/Cu"
t:0 <=> [[ Con ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@¹: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@¹n/CCn̄
        [[ Con ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv
        [[ VlessFric:VoiceFric ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@³(u)/Cu
        _ [[ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁵: ] / Sep ] ;
        _ [[ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* %@ˡ: ] / Sep ] ;
